Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin LEGISLATIVE FINDINGS.new text end new text begin The legislature recognizes Minnesota is a state that is known for its natural beauty and its economy benefits from tourism. Billboards significantly undermine that beauty and make the state less attractive to tourists. The legislature finds that Minnesota already has a large number of billboards, and it is in the public interest to establish a moratorium on new billboards in order to provide natural and economic benefits to the state. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin [173.28] NEW BILLBOARDS PROHIBITED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "billboard" means an advertising device as defined in section 173.02, subdivision 16, except that it includes advertising devices visible to any person, whether they are in a motor vehicle or not, but does not include an advertising device that pertains to any business, product, person, activity, event, or service that is primarily conducted, sold, manufactured, offered, or located on premises where the sign is located. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Ban on new billboards. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, after the effective date of this section, no state agency or political subdivision may issue a permit for or otherwise authorize a new billboard anywhere in the state. An ordinance, charter provision, or policy that conflicts with this section is void and not enforceable. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Existing billboards are nonconforming. new text end new text begin Existing billboards are nonconforming uses subject to sections 394.36 and 462.357, subdivision 1e. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end Sec. 3. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 462.357, subdivision 1c, is amended to read: Subd. 1c. Amortization prohibited. Except as otherwise provided in this subdivision, a municipality must not enact, amend, or enforce an ordinance providing for the elimination or termination of a use by amortization which use was lawful at the time of its inception. This subdivision does not apply to new text begin billboards as defined in section 173.28, new text end adults-only bookstores, adults-only theaters, or similar adults-only businesses, as defined by ordinance. new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end